Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-32,106
Council; duties.

The duties of the Missouri Basin Natural Resources Council shall be to:

(1) Collect and disseminate information on natural resources including studies, research, and policies between the states;

(2) Engender cooperation among and between the states on matters and issues relating to natural resources;

(3) Promote greater understanding and public awareness of the issues relating to natural resources in the states; and

(4) Make recommendations to the governors and legislatures of the states on matters relating to natural resources of mutual interest and concern in and between the states.

Laws 1985, LB 705, § 5.